Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for  a six-year period beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limits for pay-
ment of expenses from  fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but
excluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected or received by the state agencies listed,
for the acquisition of land and the acquisition, planning, constructing, altering, repairing,
furnishing and equipping of buildings and facilities:
(1) Oregon Department of
Administrative Services:
(a) Deferred Maintenance............... $ 15,500,000
(b) Gender Neutral Facilities
and Mothers’ Rooms ................. $ 10,000,000
(c) Capitol Mall Parking
Structure Improvements .......... $ 2,750,000
(d) Dome Building and
Yaquina Hall Improvements ..... $ 1,500,000
(e) Climate Adaptation and
Net Zero Solutions .................... $ 2,000,000
(f) Parking Lot Improvements
and EV Charging Station
Expansions................................ $ 2,000,000
(g) Executive Building Interior
and Seismic Renovation ............ $ 45,000,000
(h) North Valley Complex
Infrastructure Upgrades/
Tenant Improvements ............... $ 60,000,000
(i) Yellow Parking Lot Paving ....... $ 4,000,000
(2) Oregon Military Department:
(a) Ashland Armory Service
Enrolled Senate Bill 5506 (SB 5506-A) Page 1
Life Extension........................... $ 5,373,235
(b) Corvallis Armory Service
Life Extension ........................... $ 4,317,605
(c) Washington County
Readiness Center ...................... $ 5,300,000
(3) Oregon Youth Authority:
(a) Camp Riverbend Dorm
Renovation................................ $ 6,867,101
(b) Capital Improvements............... $ 6,742,239
(c) MacLaren West Cottages
Renovations............................... $ 8,000,000
(d) Tillamook Dorm
Renovation................................ $ 10,279,899
(4) Department of Corrections:
(a) Capital Improvement and
Renewal..................................... $ 70,000,000
(b) Off-Net Telephone
Infrastructure ........................... $ 3,508,206
(5) Oregon State Police:
(a) Central Point Office Expansion $ 33,961,269
(b) Springfield Forensic Lab and
Medical Examiner’s Office ........ $ 61,982,733
(c) Springfield Patrol Area
Command Office........................ $ 14,261,687
(6) Department of Transportation:
(a) Meacham Maintenance
Station ...................................... $ 12,000,000
(b) South Coast Maintenance
Station ...................................... $ 16,200,000
(c) Region 3-5 Headquarters
HVAC Upgrades ........................ $ 3,800,000
(7) Oregon Department of
Aviation, Siletz Bay State
Airport Runway and
Electrical Rehabilitation ........... $ 320,000
(8) State Forestry Department:
(a) Santiam District Office
Replacement.............................. $ 2,500,000
(b) Toledo Facility
Replacement Phase II ............... $ 1,632,842
(9) Oregon Department of
Fish and Wildlife, Capital
Improvement and Renewal ....... $ 5,000,000
(10) State Parks and Recreation
Department, Capital
Improvement and Renewal ....... $ 50,000,000
(11) Oregon Health Authority:
(a) OSH Salem Well Water
Treatment Facility .................... $ 4,492,750
(b) OSH Salem/Junction City
Automated Dispensing
Cabinets .................................... $ 3,500,000
Enrolled Senate Bill 5506 (SB 5506-A) Page 2
(12) Housing and Community
Services Department,
Local Innovation and Fast
Track (LIFT) Housing,
Permanent Supportive
Housing..................................... $410,000,000
(13) Oregon Liquor Control
Commission:
(a) Liquor Warehouse
Conveyor System ...................... $ 10,000,000
(b) Liquor Warehouse
Land and Building..................... $ 52,537,265
(14) Department of Education:
(a) Oregon School for the
Deaf ADA Restrooms ................ $ 1,024,625
(b) Oregon School for the
Deaf Fire Alarm
System Replacement ................. $ 3,091,923
(c) Oregon School for the
Deaf Windows Upgrade ............. $ 1,383,452
(15) Judicial Department,
Supreme Court Building
Renovation................................ $ 21,700,000
SECTION 2.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for a six-year period beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limits  for pay-
ment of expenses from federal funds collected or  received by the state agencies listed, for
the acquisition of land and the acquisition, planning, constructing,  altering, repairing, fur-
nishing and equipping of buildings and facilities:
(1) Oregon Department of
Aviation, Siletz Bay State
Airport Runway and
Electrical Rehabilitation ........... $ 3,069,187
(2) Oregon Military Department:
(a) Camp Umatilla Barracks
Facilities ................................... $ 8,000,000
(b) Camp Umatilla Guard Shack .... $ 1,100,000
(c) Washington County
Readiness Center ...................... $ 22,700,000
SECTION 3.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$445,905,100 is established for a six-year period beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum  limit
for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues,  including Miscellaneous Re-
ceipts, but excluding lottery funds and  federal funds, collected or received by the Higher
Education Coordinating Commission,  for expenditures of proceeds from state bonds issued
for the benefit of a public university, pursuant to  agreements between the commission and
a public university.
SECTION 4. Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$56,496,994 is established for a six-year period beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum  limit
for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues,  including Miscellaneous Re-
ceipts, but excluding lottery funds and  federal funds, collected or received by the Higher
Education Coordinating Commission,  for expenditures of proceeds from state bonds issued
for the benefit of a community college, pursuant to agreements between the commission  and
a community college.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5506 (SB 5506-A) Page 3
SECTION 5. The project approvals and expenditure limitations in sections 1, 2,  3 and 4
of this 2021 Act and  the expenditure limitations established by the Emergency Board during
the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, for capital construction or acquisition projects, expire
on June 30, 2027, unless otherwise noted.
SECTION 6. The expiration dates of the project approvals and expenditure limitations
authorized by the Legislative Assembly for  the following projects are extended to the fol-
lowing dates:
(1) Oregon Military Department:
(a) Youth Challenge Armory
(other funds) (section 1
(2)(b), chapter 808,
Oregon Laws 2015) .................... December 31, 2021
(b) Regional Training Institute
(other funds) (section 1
(2)(e), chapter 808,
Oregon Laws 2015, as amended
by section 1, chapter 67,
Oregon Laws 2016) .................... December 31, 2022
(2) Department of Transportation:
(a) South Coast Maintenance
Station (other funds)
(section 1 (6)(a), chapter
808, Oregon Laws 2015) ............. June 30, 2023
(b) Meacham Maintenance
Station (other funds)
(section 1 (6)(b), chapter
808, Oregon Laws 2015) ............. June 30, 2024
(3) Oregon Youth Authority:
(a) Rogue Valley Facility
Improvements (other funds)
(section 1 (3)(a), chapter 808,
Oregon Laws 2015) .................... September 30, 2021
(b) MacLaren Facility
Improvements (other funds)
(section 1 (3)(b), chapter 808,
Oregon Laws 2015) ....................  September 30, 2021
(c) CCTV Cameras (other funds)
(section 1 (3)(c), chapter 808,
Oregon Laws 2015) .................... September 30, 2021
(d) Deferred Maintenance and
Capital Improvements (other
funds) (section 1 (3)(d),
chapter 808, Oregon Laws 2015,
as amended by section 1,
chapter 67, Oregon Laws 2016) .  September 30, 2021
SECTION 7.
 Section 2, chapter 662, Oregon Laws 2019, is amended to read:
Sec. 2.  Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  and notwithstanding any action
of the Emergency Board,  the following amounts are established for a six-year  period beginning
July 1, 2019, as the maximum limits for the payment of expenses from federal funds  collected or
received by the state agencies listed, for the acquisition  of land and the acquisition, planning, con-
structing, altering, repairing, furnishing and equipping of buildings and facilities:
(1) Oregon Department of Aviation:
Enrolled Senate Bill 5506 (SB 5506-A) Page 4
(a) Aurora State Airport
Run-Up Area Construction ............. $ 1,845,000
(b) Condon State Airport
Runway Rehabilitation ..................... $ 2,340,000
(c) Siletz Bay State Airport
Taxiway Rehabilitation .................... $ 1,026,000
(2) Oregon Military Department:
(a) Salem and Anderson
Readiness Center Service
Life Extension .................................... $ 6,200,000
(b) Boardman Tactical Unmanned
[Aerial Vehicle Facility .................... $ 12,000,000]
Aerial Vehicle Facility .............. $ 15,000,000
(c) Umatilla Wastewater Treatment
[Facility and Water Supply Line .... $ 6,000,000]
Facility and Water Supply Line $ 8,900,000
(d) Grants Pass Armory
Service Life Extension ..................... $ 4,300,000
SECTION 8.
 Section 4, chapter 662, Oregon Laws 2019, is amended to read:
Sec. 4.  Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of [ $24,860,000]
$23,360,000 is established for a six-year period beginning July  1, 2019, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous  Receipts, but
excluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected or received  by the Higher Education Coordi-
nating Commission, for expenditures of proceeds from state bonds issued for the benefit  of a com-
munity college, pursuant to agreements between the commission and a community college.
SECTION 9.  Section 4, chapter 747, Oregon Laws 2017, is amended to read:
Sec. 4.  Notwithstanding any other  law limiting expenditures, the amount of [ $101,397,241]
$72,400,247 is established for a six-year period beginning  July 1, 2017, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts  and
reimbursements from federal service  agreements, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not
described in this section, collected or received by the Higher Education  Coordinating Commission,
for expenditures of proceeds from state bonds issued for  the benefit of a community college, pursu-
ant to agreements between the commission and a community college.
SECTION 10. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, and in lieu of the
limitation on expenditures established at the  December 14, 2018, Emergency Board meeting
(Item No. 25), as increased at the September 25, 2020, Emergency Board  meeting (Item No.
33), the amount of $25,000,000 is established for a six-year period beginning July 1,  2017, as
the maximum limit for payment of expenses for the Camp  Umatilla Regional Training Insti-
tute Re-Set project from federal funds collected or received by the Oregon Military  Depart-
ment.
SECTION 11. The Legislative Assembly approves the  proposal of the Oregon Military
Department, submitted in  accordance with ORS 396.515 (4), for the sale of the Lebanon Ar-
mory and Lebanon Organizational Maintenance Shop.
SECTION 12. This 2021 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation  of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2021 Act takes effect
July 1, 2021.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5506 (SB 5506-A) Page 5
Passed by Senate June 25, 2021
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Passed by House June 26, 2021
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Shemia Fagan, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 5506 (SB 5506-A) Page 6